test/src/gt-desc-yamls/N-tuli34_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - tuli: # Noun (34) tuli 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     tuli+N+Sg+Nom: tuli
     tuli+N+Sg+Gen: tulõ
     tuli+N+Sg+Par: tuld
     tuli+N+Sg+Ill: tullõ
     tuli+N+Sg+Ine: [tulõn, tulõh, tulõhn]
     tuli+N+Sg+Ela: tulõst
     tuli+N+Sg+All: tulõlõ
     tuli+N+Sg+Ade: tulõl
     tuli+N+Sg+Abl: tulõlt
     tuli+N+Sg+Tra: tulõs
     tuli+N+Sg+Ter: tulõniq
     tuli+N+Sg+Abe: tulõldaq
     tuli+N+Sg+Com: tulõgaq
     tuli+N+Pl+Nom: tulõq
     tuli+N+Pl+Gen: tulli
     tuli+N+Pl+Par: tulli
     tuli+N+Pl+Ill: [tullihe, tulli, tullidõ]
     tuli+N+Pl+Ine: [tulin, tulih, tulihn, tullin, tullih, tullihn]
     tuli+N+Pl+Ela: [tulist, tullist]
     tuli+N+Pl+All: [tulilõ, tullilõ]
     tuli+N+Pl+Ade: [tulil, tullil]
     tuli+N+Pl+Abl: [tulilt, tullilt]
     tuli+N+Pl+Tra: [tulis, tullis]
     tuli+N+Pl+Ter: [tuliniq, tulliniq]
     tuli+N+Pl+Abe: [tulildaq, tullildaq]
     tuli+N+Pl+Com: [tulligaq]
